Illinois, session 104th, HB4039.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4Article 1. General Provisions 5    Section 1-1. Short title; references to Act. 6    (a) Short title. This Act may be cited as the Holistic 7Overdose Prevention and Equity Act.8    (b) References to Act. This Act may be referred to as the 9HOPE Act. 10    Section 1-5. Findings. The General Assembly finds that:11        (1) The Department of Public Health reported 3,261 12    opioid-related overdose fatalities in 2022, representing 13    an estimated 272 lives lost every month as the State's 14    overdose crisis persists.15        (2) The Cook County Medical Examiner's Office 16    confirmed that 2,000 opioid-related deaths occurred in 17    Cook County during 2022, with Black residents comprising 18    56% of deaths despite only representing 23% of the 19    county's population.20        (3) The Opioid Data Dashboard provided by the 21    Department of Public Health vividly demonstrates the 22    extensive reach of opioid-related overdose across the   HB4039- 2 -LRB104 13076 BDA 25057 b1    State; outside of Cook County, the counties that 2    experience the brunt of fatalities include Will County, 3    Winnebago County, DuPage County, Lake County, Kane County, 4    Madison County, St. Clair County, Sangamon County, McHenry 5    County, and Champaign County.6        (4) Harm reduction measures have been proven to reduce 7    HIV transmissions, among other benefits, including 8    assisting in the prevention against the acquisition of 9    other bloodborne viruses such as Hepatitis B and C, the 10    prevention of fatal overdoses, decrease in encounters with 11    the criminal justice system, reduction in crime, reduction 12    of social exclusion for people who use drugs, and 13    improvement in access to medical care, mental health 14    support, housing, community support, food, and other basic 15    needs.16        (5) Extensive research and reports continue to 17    demonstrate that harm reduction strategies not only save 18    lives by preventing overdose deaths but also limit 19    expenses in response to hospitalizations, emergency calls, 20    and deaths, promote public safety by diverting hazardous 21    waste from public spaces, and do not lead to an increase in 22    crime rates or substance use.23        (6) Harm reduction operates on the understanding that 24    recovery is a multifaceted journey and that harm reduction 25    strategies complement traditional recovery approaches.26        (7) While people who use drugs continue to face social   HB4039- 3 -LRB104 13076 BDA 25057 b1    stigma, they still possess the right to receive access to 2    housing, education, economic mobility, mental health care, 3    and a range of services to support a better quality of 4    life.5        (8) Harm reduction acknowledges the intersecting 6    systems of oppression that marginalize people who use 7    drugs and centers the need for racial, economic, and 8    gender justice within policies and practices.9        (9) Across the State, harm reductionists tirelessly 10    dedicate themselves toward mitigating the harms of 11    substance use and providing critical support to 12    individuals in need, and it is essential to recognize and 13    appreciate the strain and labor undertaken by these 14    individuals as they endure secondary trauma and navigate 15    complex social, economic, and political landscapes.16        (10) Recent reports have highlighted funding and other 17    stresses endured by harm reduction providers, including 18    inadequate and inefficient distribution of opioid 19    settlement funds. 20    Section 1-10. Definitions. In this Act:21    "Department" means the Department of Public Health.22    "Harm reduction" means a philosophical framework and set 23of strategies designed to reduce harm and promote dignity and 24well-being among persons and communities who engage in 25substance use.  HB4039- 4 -LRB104 13076 BDA 25057 b1    "Harm reduction provider" means a needle and hypodermic 2syringe access program registered with the Department of 3Public Health, as described in the Overdose Prevention and 4Harm Reduction Act, where traditional harm reduction services 5are the agency's primary focus and harm reduction principles 6guide the organization.7    "Harm reduction professional" means a specialist who 8engages directly with people who use drugs to prevent overdose 9and infectious disease transmission; improve physical, mental, 10and social well-being; and offer low barrier options for 11accessing health care services, including substance use and 12mental health disorder treatment.13    "Overdose prevention site" means a hygienic location where 14individuals may safely consume pre-obtained substances under 15observation.16    "People with lived or living experience" means individuals 17who currently or in the past have used drugs, been diagnosed 18with a substance use disorder, experienced an overdose, or 19used harm reduction services.20    "Medication-assisted treatment" means the use of U.S. Food 21and Drug Administration-approved medications, in combination 22with counseling and behavioral therapies, to provide a whole 23patient approach to the treatment of substance use disorders.24    "Medications for opioid use disorder" means the use of 25U.S. Food and Drug Administration-approved medications to 26treat opioid use disorders.   HB4039- 5 -LRB104 13076 BDA 25057 b1Article 2. Harm Reduction Program Board 2    Section 2-5. Purpose. The Harm Reduction Program Board is 3created to advance the State's efforts to save lives through 4harm reduction through improved alignment of existing efforts, 5sustained and strategic investment, and emphasis on input from 6people with lived or living experience. 7    Section 2-10. Membership. 8    (a) Members of the Harm Reduction Program Board shall 9represent the diversity of this State and possess the 10expertise needed to perform the responsibilities of the Harm 11Reduction Program Board. Members of the Harm Reduction Program 12Board shall include the following:13        (1) One representative of a statewide coalition 14    addressing harm reduction, appointed by the Governor.15        (2) One member of the General Assembly, appointed by 16    the President of the Senate.17        (3) One member of the General Assembly, appointed by 18    the Speaker of the House of Representatives.19        (4) One member of the General Assembly, appointed by 20    the Minority Leader of the Senate.21        (5) One member of the General Assembly, appointed by 22    the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.23        (6) The Director of Public Health or the Director's   HB4039- 6 -LRB104 13076 BDA 25057 b1    designee, who shall serve as co-chair.2        (7) The Secretary of Human Services or the Secretary's 3    designee.4        (8) The Chief Behavioral Health Officer or the Chief 5    Behavioral Health Officer's designee.6        (9) The Statewide Opioid Settlement Administrator or 7    the Statewide Opioid Settlement Administrator's designee.8        (10) One person with lived or living experience with 9    drug use, substance use disorder, overdose, or use of harm 10    reduction services, appointed by the President of the 11    Senate.12        (11) One person with lived or living experience with 13    drug use, substance use disorder, overdose, or use of harm 14    reduction services, appointed by the Speaker of the House 15    of Representatives, who shall serve as co-chair.16        (12) One person with lived or living experience with 17    drug use, substance use disorder, overdose, or use of harm 18    reduction services, appointed by the Minority Leader of 19    the Senate.20        (13) One person with lived or living experience with 21    drug use, substance use disorder, overdose, or use of harm 22    reduction services, appointed by the Minority Leader of 23    the House of Representatives.24        (14) One person who has lost an immediate family 25    member to a fatal overdose, appointed by the Governor.26        (15) One representative of a statewide organization of   HB4039- 7 -LRB104 13076 BDA 25057 b1    behavioral health providers, appointed by the Governor.2        (16) One representative of a statewide organization of 3    addiction medicine specialists, appointed by the Governor.4        (17) Two employees of community-based providers of 5    harm reduction services, appointed by the Director of 6    Public Health.7        (18) One person employed by a research institution who 8    has conducted research on harm reduction, appointed by the 9    Director of Public Health.10        (19) Additional members with lived or living 11    experience with drug use, substance use disorder, 12    overdose, or use of harm reduction services as needed to 13    ensure that a majority of Harm Reduction Program Board 14    members have lived or living experience, appointed by the 15    Director of Public Health.16    (b) Members of the Harm Reduction Program Board shall 17serve without compensation except those designated as 18individuals with lived or living experience may receive 19stipends as compensation for their time. Members of the Harm 20Reduction Program Board may be reimbursed for reasonable 21expenses incurred in the performance of their duties from 22funds appropriated for that purpose.23    (c) The Harm Reduction Program Board may exercise any 24power, perform any function, take any action, or do anything 25in furtherance of its purposes and goals upon the appointment 26of a quorum of its members. The Harm Reduction Program Board   HB4039- 8 -LRB104 13076 BDA 25057 b1terms shall end 4 years from the date of appointment. 2    Section 2-15. Meetings. The Harm Reduction Program Board 3shall meet at least quarterly and may do so either in person or 4remotely. The Department of Public Health shall provide 5administrative support. 6    Section 2-20. Responsibilities. Within 12 months after the 7effective date of this Act, the Harm Reduction Program Board 8shall:9        (1) develop a process to solicit applications for 10    community-based harm reduction grants;11        (2) review community-based harm reduction grant 12    applications and proposed agreements and approve the 13    distribution of resources;14        (3) develop a process to support ongoing monitoring 15    and evaluation of community-based harm reduction programs; 16    and17        (4) deliver an annual report on grants awarded and 18    recommendations for harm reduction public policy to the 19    General Assembly and to the Governor to be posted on the 20    Department of Public Health website. 21Article 3. Grant Funding 22    Section 3-5. Grant-making authority.  HB4039- 9 -LRB104 13076 BDA 25057 b1    (a) The Department of Public Health shall have 2grant-making, operational, and procurement authority to 3distribute funds to harm reduction providers to execute the 4functions established in this Act.5    (b) Subject to appropriation, the Department shall issue 6grants to harm reduction providers. Grants shall be issued on 7or before September 1 of the relevant fiscal year and shall 8allow for pre-award expenditures beginning July 1 of the 9relevant fiscal year.10    (c) Beginning in fiscal year 2028 and subject to 11appropriation, grants shall be awarded for a project period of 123 years, contingent on Department requirements for reporting 13and successful performance.14    (d) The Department shall ensure that grants awarded under 15this Act do not duplicate or supplant grants awarded under any 16other Act.17    (e) The Department may, subject to appropriation and 18approval through the Opioid Overdose Prevention and Recovery 19Steering Committee, after recommendation by the Illinois 20Opioid Remediation Advisory Board, and certification by the 21Office of the Attorney General, make harm reduction grants to 22harm reduction providers addressing opioid remediation in the 23State for approved abatement uses under the Illinois Opioid 24Allocation Agreement. The Illinois Opioid Remediation State 25Trust Fund shall be the source of funding for the program. 26Eligible grant recipients shall be harm reduction providers   HB4039- 10 -LRB104 13076 BDA 25057 b1that offer services in a manner that supports and meets the 2approved uses of the opioid settlement funds. Eligible grant 3recipients have no entitlement to a grant under this Section. 4The Department of Public Health may consult with the 5Department of Human Services to adopt rules to implement this 6Section and may create a competitive application procedure for 7grants to be awarded. The rules may specify the manner of 8applying for grants; grantee eligibility requirements; project 9eligibility requirements; restrictions on the use of grant 10moneys; the manner in which grantees must account for the use 11of grant moneys; and any other provision that the Department 12of Public Health determines to be necessary or useful for the 13administration of this Section. 14    Section 3-10. Grants for harm reduction services.15    (a) Subject to appropriation, the Department shall make 16grants to harm reduction providers.17    (b) The Department shall issue grants to ensure that harm 18reduction services are available in all counties. A harm 19reduction provider may receive a grant to provide harm 20reduction services in more than one county.21    (c) Harm reduction providers receiving grants under this 22Act shall establish eligibility criteria for services.23    (d) An eligible participant shall not be court ordered to 24receive services funded by a grant under this Act.25    (e) Harm reduction providers receiving grants under this   HB4039- 11 -LRB104 13076 BDA 25057 b1Act shall provide the following harm reduction services 2directly or through subgrants to other organizations:3        (1) Provision of harm reduction supplies, including, 4    but not limited to, overdose reversal supplies, including 5    naloxone kits with 3 milligram and generic nasal 6    variations; substance test kits, including fentanyl test 7    strips and xylazine test strips; safer sex kits, including 8    condoms; sharps disposal and medication disposal kits; 9    wound care supplies; medication lock boxes; sterile water 10    and saline; ascorbic acid (vitamin C); nicotine cessation 11    therapies; food and beverages (including, snacks, protein 12    drinks, and water); supplies to promote sterile injection 13    and reduce infectious disease transmission through 14    injection drug use; safer smoking kits to reduce 15    infectious disease transmission; FDA-approved home testing 16    kits for viral hepatitis (such as, HBV and HCV) and HIV; 17    written educational materials on safer injection practices 18    and HIV and viral hepatitis and prevention, testing, 19    treatment, and care services; distribution mechanisms (for 20    example, bags for naloxone or safer sex kits, and metal 21    boxes or containers for holding naloxone) for harm 22    reduction supplies, including stock as otherwise described 23    and delineated on this list.24        (2) Overdose reversal education and training services.25        (3) Navigation services to ensure linkage to HIV and 26    viral hepatitis prevention, testing, treatment, and care   HB4039- 12 -LRB104 13076 BDA 25057 b1    services, including antiretroviral therapy for HCV and 2    HIV, pre-exposure prophylaxis (PEP), post-exposure 3    prophylaxis (PEP), prevention of mother to child 4    transmission, and partner services.5        (4) Referral to hepatitis A and hepatitis B 6    vaccinations.7        (5) Provision of education on HIV and viral hepatitis 8    prevention, testing, and referral to treatment services.9        (6) Provision of information on local resources or 10    referrals for PEP, or both.11    (f) Harm reduction providers receiving grants under this 12Act may provide the following services directly or through 13subgrants to other organizations:14        (1) Contingency management services, in which tangible 15    incentives are given to participants contingent on 16    evidence of change in a specific, incentivized behavior 17    such as abstinence from a particular drug.18        (2) Services to promote hygiene and other basic needs, 19    including, but not limited to, mobile showers and clothing 20    distribution.21        (3) Other services necessary to promote harm 22    reduction, as determined by the harm reduction provider 23    and approved by the Department.24    (g) Harm reduction providers receiving grants under this 25Act may utilize funds for the following activities, subject to 26approval by the Department:  HB4039- 13 -LRB104 13076 BDA 25057 b1        (1) compensation and fringe benefits for harm 2    reduction staff and supervisors;3        (2) research and evaluation;4        (3) community outreach and education; and5        (4) building capacity in the harm reduction field.6    (h) Grant funds may be used for capital expenses, subject 7to approval by the Department.8    (i) Harm reduction providers receiving grants under this 9Act shall ensure that services are accessible to individuals 10with disabilities and to individuals with limited English 11proficiency. Harm reduction providers receiving grants under 12this Act shall not deny services to individuals on the basis of 13immigration status or gender identity.14    (j) Unless otherwise provided by law, a harm reduction 15provider receiving a grant under this Act shall not be 16compelled to produce any documentation related to confidential 17disclosures made by an eligible participant to that harm 18reduction provider, and shall not be compelled to testify 19regarding confidential disclosures made by such eligible 20participant, in any criminal proceeding, if the sole purpose 21for such documentation or testimony is related to an eligible 22participant's drug use or other related activity.23    (k) The Department shall encourage harm reduction 24providers receiving grants under this Act to employ 25individuals with lived experience.   HB4039- 14 -LRB104 13076 BDA 25057 b1Article 4. Administrative Oversight 2    Section 4-5. Chief Harm Reduction Officer. This Article 3establishes a Chief Harm Reduction Officer. The Officer shall 4lead the State's comprehensive, interagency effort to ensure 5that harm reduction services are available statewide, that the 6State-supported system respects the dignity of people who use 7drugs, and that investments in harm reduction services are 8sustained and strategic. The Officer shall serve as a 9policymaker and spokesperson on harm reduction, including 10coordinating the interagency effort through legislation, 11rules, and budgets; ensuring inclusion of people with lived 12and living experience in policymaking; communicating with the 13General Assembly and federal and local leaders on these 14critical issues; and coordinating with harm reduction 15providers and other community-based organizations. The Chief 16Harm Reduction Officer shall be under the jurisdiction of the 17Department. 18    Section 4-10. Department of Public Health administering 19harm reduction programming and funding. Unless otherwise 20indicated in this Act or in other Acts, harm reduction 21programming and funding shall be administered by the 22Department. 23Article 5. Training, Technical Assistance, and Education   HB4039- 15 -LRB104 13076 BDA 25057 b1    Section 5-5. Role of harm reduction providers. 2Organizations or agencies that do not meet the definition of 3harm reduction provider must subcontract with a harm reduction 4provider to meet any requirements for harm reduction 5programming, training, education, or technical assistance 6established under this Act. 7    Section 5-10. Local government training. Subject to 8availability of funding, the Department and the Harm Reduction 9Program Board shall establish a program to provide 10comprehensive education and training for local government 11agencies, including law enforcement and court stakeholders, 12about this Act and the Overdose Prevention and Harm Reduction 13Act, with a focus on ensuring compliance with laws that 14provide immunity for participants, harm reduction providers, 15and harm reduction staff and volunteers. 16    Section 5-15. The Department of Professional Regulation 17Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by 18adding Section 2105-372 as follows: 19    (20 ILCS 2105/2105-372 new)20    Sec. 2105-372. Continuing education; harm reduction.21    (a) As used in this Section:22    "Harm reduction" means a philosophical framework and set   HB4039- 16 -LRB104 13076 BDA 25057 b1of strategies designed to reduce harm and promote dignity and 2well-being among persons and communities who engage in 3substance use.4    "Health care professional" means a person licensed or 5registered by the Department under the following Acts: the 6Medical Practice Act of 1987, the Nurse Practice Act, the 7Clinical Psychologist Licensing Act, the Illinois Optometric 8Practice Act of 1987, the Illinois Physical Therapy Act, the 9Pharmacy Practice Act, the Physician Assistant Practice Act of 101987, the Clinical Social Work and Social Work Practice Act, 11the Nursing Home Administrators Licensing and Disciplinary 12Act, the Illinois Occupational Therapy Practice Act, the 13Podiatric Medical Practice Act of 1987, the Respiratory Care 14Practice Act, the Professional Counselor and Clinical 15Professional Counselor Licensing and Practice Act, the 16Illinois Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology Practice Act, 17the Illinois Dental Practice Act, or the Behavior Analyst 18Licensing Act.19    (b) For health care professional license or registration 20renewals occurring on or after January 1, 2027, a health care 21professional who has continuing education requirements must 22complete at least a one-hour course or training on harm 23reduction. A health care professional may count this one hour 24for completion of this course toward meeting the minimum 25credit hours required for continuing education.26    (c) Any course or training offered to meet the   HB4039- 17 -LRB104 13076 BDA 25057 b1requirements of this Section must be designed by or delivered 2by a harm reduction provider or harm reduction professional.3    (d) The Department may adopt rules for the implementation 4of this Section. 5Article 6. Place-Based Approach to Harm Reduction 6    Section 6-5. Intent; purpose. This Article creates a 7place-based approach to expand harm reduction education and 8training, community engagement, mobile outreach, and 9medication-assisted treatment in the communities with the 10highest levels of overdoses and greatest unmet need for harm 11reduction services. 12    Section 6-10. Pilot.13    (a) Subject to availability of funding, the Department 14shall make grants to one harm reduction provider in a 15community in each Department region to coordinate a 16place-based approach to harm reduction.17    (b) Harm reduction providers receiving grants under this 18Article shall provide the following services directly, through 19subgrants to other organizations, or in coordination with 20organizations receiving funding from other sources:21        (1) Community education and engagement on harm 22    reduction.23        (2) Mobile outreach to the populations at highest risk   HB4039- 18 -LRB104 13076 BDA 25057 b1    of overdose.2        (3) Provision of or referral to medication-assisted 3    treatment.4    (c) Harm reduction providers receiving grants under this 5Article may provide other services as necessary to expand harm 6reduction and prevent overdose in the community, either 7directly, through subgrants to other organizations, or in 8coordination with organizations receiving funding from other 9sources, as determined by the harm reduction provider and 10approved by the Department.11    (d) The harm reduction provider shall provide training and 12technical assistance on harm reduction to subgrantees and 13other collaborating organizations.14    (e) Harm reduction providers receiving grants under this 15Article and collaborating organizations are prohibited from 16sharing information about participants with law enforcement 17and from undertaking activities to increase arrest or 18prosecution for drug-related offenses or of people who use 19drugs. 20    Section 6-15. Community selection. The Department shall 21determine communities for the pilot by considering the 22following factors:23        (1) community population and poverty level;24        (2) the geographic size of a community;25        (3) the number of fatal and nonfatal overdoses in the   HB4039- 19 -LRB104 13076 BDA 25057 b1    community;2        (4) recent trends in the number of overdoses in the 3    community;4        (5) the number of harm reduction providers in the 5    community; and6        (6) how many people are served by harm reduction 7    providers in the community. 8Article 7. Correctional Facilities 9    Section 7-5. Incarceration; naloxone. Naloxone shall be 10made readily available to all correctional staff, health care 11staff, other staff, and incarcerated individuals in all 12prisons and jails, subject to the availability of funding to 13support the prison or jail in obtaining a supply of naloxone. 14    Section 7-10. The Counties Code is amended by adding 15Section 3-6043 as follows: 16    (55 ILCS 5/3-6043 new)17    Sec. 3-6043. Release; naloxone. Upon the release of a 18prisoner from a correctional institution, the sheriff shall 19provide the prisoner with naloxone and a referral to a harm 20reduction provider. 21    Section 7-15. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended   HB4039- 20 -LRB104 13076 BDA 25057 b1by changing Section 3-14-1 as follows: 2    (730 ILCS 5/3-14-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1003-14-1)3    Sec. 3-14-1. Release from the institution. 4    (a) Upon release of a person on parole, mandatory release, 5final discharge, or pardon, the Department shall return all 6property held for him, provide him with suitable clothing and 7procure necessary transportation for him to his designated 8place of residence and employment. It may provide such person 9with a grant of money for travel and expenses which may be paid 10in installments. The amount of the money grant shall be 11determined by the Department.12    (a-1) The Department shall, before a wrongfully imprisoned 13person, as defined in Section 3-1-2 of this Code, is 14discharged from the Department, provide him or her with any 15documents necessary after discharge. 16    (a-2) The Department of Corrections may establish and 17maintain, in any institution it administers, revolving funds 18to be known as "Travel and Allowances Revolving Funds". These 19revolving funds shall be used for advancing travel and expense 20allowances to committed, paroled, and discharged prisoners. 21The moneys paid into such revolving funds shall be from 22appropriations to the Department for Committed, Paroled, and 23Discharged Prisoners.24    (a-3) Upon release of a person who is eligible to vote on 25parole, mandatory release, final discharge, or pardon, the   HB4039- 21 -LRB104 13076 BDA 25057 b1Department shall provide the person with a form that informs 2him or her that his or her voting rights have been restored and 3a voter registration application. The Department shall have 4available voter registration applications in the languages 5provided by the Illinois State Board of Elections. The form 6that informs the person that his or her rights have been 7restored shall include the following information:8        (1) All voting rights are restored upon release from 9    the Department's custody.10        (2) A person who is eligible to vote must register in 11    order to be able to vote. 12    The Department of Corrections shall confirm that the 13person received the voter registration application and has 14been informed that his or her voting rights have been 15restored. 16    (a-4) Prior to release of a person on parole, mandatory 17supervised release, final discharge, or pardon, the Department 18shall screen every person for Medicaid eligibility. Officials 19of the correctional institution or facility where the 20committed person is assigned shall assist an eligible person 21to complete a Medicaid application to ensure that the person 22begins receiving benefits as soon as possible after his or her 23release. The application must include the eligible person's 24address associated with his or her residence upon release from 25the facility. If the residence is temporary, the eligible 26person must notify the Department of Human Services of his or   HB4039- 22 -LRB104 13076 BDA 25057 b1her change in address upon transition to permanent housing. 2    (b) (Blank).3    (c) Except as otherwise provided in this Code, the 4Department shall establish procedures to provide written 5notification of any release of any person who has been 6convicted of a felony to the State's Attorney and sheriff of 7the county from which the offender was committed, and the 8State's Attorney and sheriff of the county into which the 9offender is to be paroled or released. Except as otherwise 10provided in this Code, the Department shall establish 11procedures to provide written notification to the proper law 12enforcement agency for any municipality of any release of any 13person who has been convicted of a felony if the arrest of the 14offender or the commission of the offense took place in the 15municipality, if the offender is to be paroled or released 16into the municipality, or if the offender resided in the 17municipality at the time of the commission of the offense. If a 18person convicted of a felony who is in the custody of the 19Department of Corrections or on parole or mandatory supervised 20release informs the Department that he or she has resided, 21resides, or will reside at an address that is a housing 22facility owned, managed, operated, or leased by a public 23housing agency, the Department must send written notification 24of that information to the public housing agency that owns, 25manages, operates, or leases the housing facility. The written 26notification shall, when possible, be given at least 14 days   HB4039- 23 -LRB104 13076 BDA 25057 b1before release of the person from custody, or as soon 2thereafter as possible. The written notification shall be 3provided electronically if the State's Attorney, sheriff, 4proper law enforcement agency, or public housing agency has 5provided the Department with an accurate and up to date email 6address. 7    (c-1) (Blank).8    (c-2) The Department shall establish procedures to provide 9notice to the Illinois State Police of the release or 10discharge of persons convicted of violations of the 11Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act or a 12violation of the Methamphetamine Precursor Control Act. The 13Illinois State Police shall make this information available to 14local, State, or federal law enforcement agencies upon 15request.16    (c-5) If a person on parole or mandatory supervised 17release becomes a resident of a facility licensed or regulated 18by the Department of Public Health, the Illinois Department of 19Public Aid, or the Illinois Department of Human Services, the 20Department of Corrections shall provide copies of the 21following information to the appropriate licensing or 22regulating Department and the licensed or regulated facility 23where the person becomes a resident:24        (1) The mittimus and any pre-sentence investigation 25    reports.26        (2) The social evaluation prepared pursuant to Section   HB4039- 24 -LRB104 13076 BDA 25057 b1    3-8-2.2        (3) Any pre-release evaluation conducted pursuant to 3    subsection (j) of Section 3-6-2.4        (4) Reports of disciplinary infractions and 5    dispositions.6        (5) Any parole plan, including orders issued by the 7    Prisoner Review Board, and any violation reports and 8    dispositions.9        (6) The name and contact information for the assigned 10    parole agent and parole supervisor. 11    This information shall be provided within 3 days of the 12person becoming a resident of the facility. 13    (c-10) If a person on parole or mandatory supervised 14release becomes a resident of a facility licensed or regulated 15by the Department of Public Health, the Illinois Department of 16Public Aid, or the Illinois Department of Human Services, the 17Department of Corrections shall provide written notification 18of such residence to the following:19        (1) The Prisoner Review Board.20        (2) The chief of police and sheriff in the 21    municipality and county in which the licensed facility is 22    located.23    The notification shall be provided within 3 days of the 24person becoming a resident of the facility. 25    (d) Upon the release of a committed person on parole, 26mandatory supervised release, final discharge, or pardon, the   HB4039- 25 -LRB104 13076 BDA 25057 b1Department shall provide such person with information 2concerning programs and services of the Illinois Department of 3Public Health to ascertain whether such person has been 4exposed to the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) or any 5identified causative agent of Acquired Immunodeficiency 6Syndrome (AIDS).7    (d-5) Upon the release of a committed person from a 8correctional institution or facility, the Department shall 9provide the committed person with naloxone and a referral to a 10harm reduction provider. 11    (e) Upon the release of a committed person on parole, 12mandatory supervised release, final discharge, pardon, or who 13has been wrongfully imprisoned, the Department shall verify 14the released person's full name, date of birth, and social 15security number. If verification is made by the Department by 16obtaining a certified copy of the released person's birth 17certificate and the released person's social security card or 18other documents authorized by the Secretary, the Department 19shall provide the birth certificate and social security card 20or other documents authorized by the Secretary to the released 21person. If verification by the Department is done by means 22other than obtaining a certified copy of the released person's 23birth certificate and the released person's social security 24card or other documents authorized by the Secretary, the 25Department shall complete a verification form, prescribed by 26the Secretary of State, and shall provide that verification   HB4039- 26 -LRB104 13076 BDA 25057 b1form to the released person.2    (f) Forty-five days prior to the scheduled discharge of a 3person committed to the custody of the Department of 4Corrections, the Department shall give the person:5        (1) who is otherwise uninsured an opportunity to apply 6    for health care coverage including medical assistance 7    under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code in 8    accordance with subsection (b) of Section 1-8.5 of the 9    Illinois Public Aid Code, and the Department of 10    Corrections shall provide assistance with completion of 11    the application for health care coverage including medical 12    assistance;13        (2) information about obtaining a standard Illinois 14    Identification Card or a limited-term Illinois 15    Identification Card under Section 4 of the Illinois 16    Identification Card Act if the person has not been issued 17    an Illinois Identification Card under subsection (a-20) of 18    Section 4 of the Illinois Identification Card Act;19        (3) information about voter registration and may 20    distribute information prepared by the State Board of 21    Elections. The Department of Corrections may enter into an 22    interagency contract with the State Board of Elections to 23    participate in the automatic voter registration program 24    and be a designated automatic voter registration agency 25    under Section 1A-16.2 of the Election Code;26        (4) information about job listings upon discharge from   HB4039- 27 -LRB104 13076 BDA 25057 b1    the correctional institution or facility;2        (5) information about available housing upon discharge 3    from the correctional institution or facility;4        (6) a directory of elected State officials and of 5    officials elected in the county and municipality, if any, 6    in which the committed person intends to reside upon 7    discharge from the correctional institution or facility; 8    and9        (7) any other information that the Department of 10    Corrections deems necessary to provide the committed 11    person in order for the committed person to reenter the 12    community and avoid recidivism. 13    (g) Sixty days before the scheduled discharge of a person 14committed to the custody of the Department or upon receipt of 15the person's certified birth certificate and social security 16card as set forth in subsection (d) of Section 3-8-1 of this 17Act, whichever occurs later, the Department shall transmit an 18application for an Identification Card to the Secretary of 19State, in accordance with subsection (a-20) of Section 4 of 20the Illinois Identification Card Act.21    The Department may adopt rules to implement this Section. 22(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 23102-606, eff. 1-1-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-345, eff. 241-1-24.) 25    Section 7-20. The County Jail Act is amended by adding   HB4039- 28 -LRB104 13076 BDA 25057 b1Sections 19.7 and 19.9 as follows: 2    (730 ILCS 125/19.7 new)3    Sec. 19.7. Release; naloxone. Upon the release of a 4prisoner from a jail, the warden shall provide the prisoner 5with naloxone, subject to the availability of funding to 6support the jail in obtaining a supply of naloxone, and a 7referral to a harm reduction provider. 8    (730 ILCS 125/19.9 new)9    Sec. 19.9. Medication for opioid use disorder.10    (a) In this Section:11    "Clinically indicated" means a medical procedure or 12treatment is based upon the treatment provider's medical 13judgment in accordance with the current generally accepted 14standards of care.15    "Medication-assisted treatment" means the use of U.S. Food 16and Drug Administration-approved medications, in combination 17with counseling and behavioral therapies, to provide a whole 18patient approach to the treatment of substance use disorders.19    "Medications for opioid use disorder" means the use of 20U.S. Food and Drug Administration-approved medications to 21treat substance use disorders.22    (b) Within 24 hours of admission to a jail, each detained 23person shall be screened for substance use disorders as part 24of an initial and ongoing substance use screening and   HB4039- 29 -LRB104 13076 BDA 25057 b1assessment process. This process includes screening and 2assessment for opioid use disorders.3    (c) A detained person who is admitted to a jail while under 4the medical care of a licensed physician, a licensed physician 5assistant, or a licensed nurse practitioner and who is taking 6medication at the time of admission in accordance with a valid 7prescription as verified by the individual's pharmacy of 8record, primary care provider, other licensed care provider, 9or a prescription monitoring or information system, shall have 10that medication continued and provided by the jail pending an 11evaluation by a licensed physician, a licensed physician 12assistant, or a licensed nurse practitioner and subject to the 13treatment provider's medical judgment. The jail may defer 14provision of a validly prescribed medication in accordance 15with this subsection if, in the judgment of a licensed 16physician, a licensed physician assistant, or a licensed nurse 17practitioner, continuation of the medication is no longer 18clinically indicated.19    A detained person who is admitted to a jail while under the 20medical care of a licensed physician, a licensed physician 21assistant, or a licensed nurse practitioner and who is taking 22medication for an opioid use disorder or participating in 23medication-assisted treatment at the time of admission in 24accordance with a valid prescription as verified by the 25individual's pharmacy of record, primary care provider, other 26licensed care provider, or a prescription monitoring or   HB4039- 30 -LRB104 13076 BDA 25057 b1information system, shall have the detained person's 2medication continued and provided by the jail pending an 3evaluation by a licensed physician, a licensed physician 4assistant, or a licensed nurse practitioner and subject to the 5treatment provider's medical judgment. The jail may defer 6provision of a validly prescribed medication in accordance 7with this subsection if, in the judgment of a licensed 8physician, a licensed physician assistant, or a licensed nurse 9practitioner, continuation of the medication is no longer 10clinically indicated. An individual participating in a 11medication-assisted treatment program may have counseling and 12behavioral therapies continued to the extent possible.13    If at any time a detained person screens positive as 14having or being at risk for an opioid use disorder, is 15diagnosed with an opioid use disorder or is exhibiting 16symptoms of withdrawal from an opioid use disorder, and 17medication-assisted treatment is clinically indicated by a 18licensed physician, a licensed physician assistant, or a 19licensed nurse practitioner, then the individual may consent 20to commence medications for opioid use disorder, which shall 21be provided by the jail. The detained person shall be 22authorized to receive the medication immediately and for as 23long as clinically indicated.24    (d) The licensed practitioner who makes the clinical 25judgment to discontinue the use of medication shall enter the 26reason for the discontinuance to be entered into the detained   HB4039- 31 -LRB104 13076 BDA 25057 b1person's medical record, specifically stating the reason for 2discontinuance. The individual shall be provided, both orally 3and in writing, with a specific explanation of the decision to 4discontinue the medication.5    (e) As part of the reentry planning, the jail shall 6commence medications for opioid use disorder prior to an 7individual's release if:8        (1) the individual screens positive as having an 9    opioid use disorder, being at risk for an opioid use 10    disorder, or exhibiting symptoms of withdrawal from an 11    opioid use disorder;12        (2) medication-assisted treatment is clinically 13    indicated by a licensed physician, a licensed physician 14    assistant, or a licensed nurse practitioner; and15        (3) the individual consents to commence medications 16    for opioid use disorder.17    Upon reentry, the jail shall provide an individual 18participating in medication-assisted treatment with a referral 19to a provider in the community who may assist the individual 20with continued medications for opioid use disorder and 21medication-assisted treatment care. 22Article 8. Health Care Facilities 23    Section 8-5. Medication for opioid use disorder. All acute 24care hospitals that provide emergency services in an emergency   HB4039- 32 -LRB104 13076 BDA 25057 b1department, all satellite emergency facilities, and all 2inpatient behavioral health treatment providers shall 3maintain, as part of their services, protocols and capacity to 4provide appropriate, evidence-based interventions prior to 5discharge that reduce the risk of subsequent harm and fatality 6following an opioid-related overdose, including, but not 7limited to, institutional protocols and capacity to possess, 8dispense, administer, and prescribe all FDA-approved forms of 9medication for opioid use disorder. Such treatment shall be 10offered to all patients who present in an acute care hospital 11emergency department, a satellite emergency facility, or 12inpatient behavioral health treatment provider for care and 13treatment of an opioid-related overdose or opioid use 14disorder; if that treatment shall only occur when it is 15recommended by the treating healthcare provider and is 16voluntarily agreed to by the patient. Acute care hospitals 17that provide emergency services in an emergency department, 18satellite emergency facilities, and inpatient behavioral 19health treatment providers shall demonstrate compliance with 20applicable training and waiver requirements established by the 21federal Drug Enforcement Agency and the federal Substance 22Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration relative to 23prescribing medication for opioid use disorder. Prior to 24discharge, any patient who is administered or prescribed 25medication for opioid use disorder in an acute care hospital 26emergency department, satellite emergency facility, or   HB4039- 33 -LRB104 13076 BDA 25057 b1inpatient behavioral health treatment provider shall be 2directly connected to an appropriate provider or treatment 3site to voluntarily continue the treatment. 4    Section 8-10. Patient discharge and education on naloxone; 5provider referral. Upon discharge of a patient from an acute 6care hospital, satellite emergency facility, or inpatient 7behavioral health treatment provider who has: (i) a history of 8or is actively using opioids or other illicit drugs; (ii) been 9diagnosed with opioid use disorder; or (iii) experienced an 10opioid-related overdose, the acute care hospital, satellite 11emergency facility, or inpatient behavioral health treatment 12provider shall educate the patient on the use of naloxone, 13dispense not less than 2 doses of naloxone to the patient or a 14legal guardian of the patient, and directly connect the 15patient to a harm reduction provider. 16    Section 8-15. Rulemaking. The Department may adopt rules 17for the implementation of this Article. 18    Section 8-20. The Hospital Licensing Act is amended by 19adding Section 17 as follows: 20    (210 ILCS 85/17 new)21    Sec. 17. Fentanyl testing.22    (a) If an individual is treated at a hospital and the   HB4039- 34 -LRB104 13076 BDA 25057 b1hospital conducts a urine drug screening to assist in 2diagnosing the individual's condition, the hospital shall 3include testing for fentanyl in the individual's urine 4screening.5    (b) If the urine drug screening conducted in accordance 6with subsection (a) detects fentanyl, the hospital shall 7report the test results, which shall be deidentified, to the 8Department through the State-designated health information 9exchange.10    (c) This Section does not apply to a hospital that does not 11have chemical analyzer equipment.12    (d) This Section does not affect any State law providing 13civil or criminal immunity to an individual who is in need of 14medical assistance after ingesting or using alcohol or drugs, 15or to an individual who, in good faith, assists another 16individual who is in need of medical assistance after 17ingesting or using alcohol or drugs. 18Article 9. Housing 19    Section 9-5. Low barrier housing. Community-based service 20providers that are funded or regulated by the State to offer 21shelter, recovery homes, housing, or housing vouchers shall 22adopt a low barrier approach that prioritizes provision of 23stable housing before addressing other social needs and 24incorporates the following requirements:  HB4039- 35 -LRB104 13076 BDA 25057 b1        (1) Applicants may not be rejected and residents may 2    not be evicted solely based on abstinence-only or sobriety 3    requirements. Behaviors while intoxicated that violate the 4    terms of residency may be grounds for rejection of an 5    applicant for housing or eviction of a resident.6        (2) Discrimination against applicants solely on the 7    basis of criminal records, records of arrests, charges, or 8    convictions on drug-related offenses is prohibited.9    These requirements do not apply to operators or owners of 10rental housing on the private market. 11    Section 9-10. Housing evictions based on opioid use 12disorder treatment. All operators or owners of housing are 13prohibited from rejecting applicants or evicting residents 14because they are receiving medication for opioid use disorder 15or other forms of medication-assisted treatment. 16    Section 9-15. Federal requirements. Nothing in this 17Article shall be construed to prohibit a housing provider from 18complying with federal laws or regulations if housing is 19provided using both federal and State funding. 20Article 10. Home Rule Preemption 21    Section 10-5. Home rule preemption.22    (a) A home rule unit may not prohibit the establishment or   HB4039- 36 -LRB104 13076 BDA 25057 b1operation of any harm reduction activities as provided in this 2Act. 3    (b) A municipality may not adopt zoning regulations for 4the sole purpose of prohibiting the establishment or operation 5of any harm reduction activities as provided in this Act.6    (c) This Section is a denial and limitation of home rule 7powers and functions under subsection (g) of Section 6 of 8Article VII of the Illinois Constitution. 9    Section 10-10. The Overdose Prevention and Harm Reduction 10Act is amended by adding Section 20 as follows: 11    (410 ILCS 710/20 new)12    Sec. 20. Home rule preemption. A home rule unit may not 13prohibit the establishment or operation of a needle and 14hypodermic syringe access program as provided in this Act. 15This Section is a denial and limitation of home rule powers and 16functions under subsection (g) of Section 6 of Article VII of 17the Illinois Constitution.